Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
CHAPTER 45 Public Swimming Pools

Code Commission notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1269, § 1, Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1, and Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3 all enacted a Chapter 43 of Title 31. Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, the chapter enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1 has been redesignated as Chapter 44 of Title 31 and the Code sections therein redesignated accordingly. The chapter enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3 has been redesignated as Chapter 45 of Title 31 and the Code sections therein redesignated accordingly.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Public swimming pools, spas, and recreational water parks, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Public Health, Environmental Health Hazards, Subject 511-3-5.

31-45-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as “Michelle’s Law.”

History.

Code 1981, §

31-45-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3.

Code Commission notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 126, § 1, Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1, and Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3 all enacted a Chapter 43 of Title 31. Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, the chapter enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1 has been redesignated as Chapter 44 of Title 31 and the Code sections therein redesignated accordingly. The chapter enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3 has been redesignated as Chapter 45 of Title 31 and the Code sections therein redesignated accordingly.

31-45-2.
Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to protect the public health and safety through the proper design, operation, and maintenance of public swimming pools.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-45-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3.

Code Commission notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 126, § 1, Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1, and Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3 all enacted a Chapter 43 of Title 31. Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, the chapter enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1 has been redesignated as Chapter 44 of Title 31 and the Code sections therein redesignated accordingly. The chapter enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3 has been redesignated as Chapter 45 of Title 31 and the Code sections therein redesignated accordingly.

31-45-3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term “public swimming pool,” “swimming pool,” or “pool” means any structure, chamber, or tank containing an artificial body of water used by the public for swimming, diving, wading, recreation, or therapy, together with buildings, appurtenances, and equipment used in connection with the body of water, regardless of whether a fee is charged for its use. The term includes municipal, school, hotel, or motel pools and any pool to which access is granted in exchange for payment of a daily fee. This chapter shall not apply to a private pool or hot tub serving a single-family dwelling and used only by the residents of the dwelling and their guests. This chapter also shall not apply to apartment complex pools, country club pools, subdivision pools which are open only to residents of the subdivision and their guests, therapeutic pools used in physical therapy programs operated by medical facilities licensed by the department or operated by a licensed physical therapist, therapeutic chambers drained, cleaned, and refilled after each individual use, or to religious ritual baths used solely for religious purposes.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-45-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3.

Code Commission notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 126, § 1, Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1, and Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3 all enacted a Chapter 43 of Title 31. Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, the chapter enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1 has been redesignated as Chapter 44 of Title 31 and the Code sections therein redesignated accordingly. The chapter enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3 has been redesignated as Chapter 45 of Title 31 and the Code sections therein redesignated accordingly.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, “single-family dwelling” was substituted for “single family dwelling” in the third sentence, and, in the fourth sentence, a comma was inserted following “licensed physical therapist” and following “each individual use”, “nor to” was deleted preceding “therapeutic chambers drained” and “or to religious” was substituted for “nor to religious”.

31-45-4.
Issuance of permits; terms of expiration.

On or after December 31, 2000, a permit shall be obtained from the county board of health in the county in which a public swimming pool is located prior to construction or continued operation of a public swimming pool. When the ownership of a public swimming pool changes or if the pool is leased by the owner, it shall be the responsibility of the new owner or lessee to secure a permit issued in his or her name.

Unless suspended or revoked, a swimming pool operation permit shall be valid for the period of operation specified in the application, but in no event shall it be valid for more than 12 months.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-45-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3.

Code Commission notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 126, § 1, Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1, and Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3 all enacted a Chapter 43 of Title 31. Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, the chapter enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1 has been redesignated as Chapter 44 of Title 31 and the Code sections therein redesignated accordingly. The chapter enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3 has been redesignated as Chapter 45 of Title 31 and the Code sections therein redesignated accordingly.

31-45-5.
Operation permit required for each public swimming pool.

A separate application for an operation permit must be submitted for each public swimming pool. The owner or operator shall apply annually to the county board of health for an operator’s permit. A form must be obtained from the county board of health to provide:

The owner’s name, address, and telephone number;

The operator’s name, address, and telephone number;

The street address of the public swimming pool;

The physical location of the public swimming pool;

The type of public swimming pool;

The construction date, if applicable;

The proposed operating dates;

The type of disinfection; and

The signature of the owner or a designated representative of the owner.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-45-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3.

Code Commission notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 126, § 1, Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1, and Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3 all enacted a Chapter 43 of Title 31. Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, the chapter enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1 has been redesignated as Chapter 44 of Title 31 and the Code sections therein redesignated accordingly. The chapter enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3 has been redesignated as Chapter 45 of Title 31 and the Code sections therein redesignated accordingly.

31-45-6.
Construction of public swimming pools.

Construction of public swimming pools and additions and alterations to such pools may start only upon issuance and receipt of a permit pursuant to Code Section 31-45-4 and shall be in compliance with plans and data submitted in accordance with Code Section 31-45-5 and other data approved by the county board of health of the county in which each pool is located.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-45-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3.

Code Commission notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 126, § 1, Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1, and Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3 all enacted a Chapter 43 of Title 31. Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, the chapter enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1 has been redesignated as Chapter 44 of Title 31 and the Code sections therein redesignated accordingly. The chapter enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3 has been redesignated as Chapter 45 of Title 31 and the Code sections therein redesignated accordingly.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, “31-45-4” was substituted for “31-43-4” and “31-45-5” was substituted for “31-43-5” in this Code section.

31-45-7.
Notification for inspection.

A permittee shall notify the county board of health at the time of completion of the construction of a public swimming pool to permit inspection before the pool is placed in operation.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-45-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3.

Code Commission notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 126, § 1, Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1, and Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3 all enacted a Chapter 43 of Title 31. Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, the chapter enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1 has been redesignated as Chapter 44 of Title 31 and the Code sections therein redesignated accordingly. The chapter enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3 has been redesignated as Chapter 45 of Title 31 and the Code sections therein redesignated accordingly.

31-45-8.
Inspections by the county board of health.

Each public swimming pool shall be inspected by the county board of health to determine compliance with this chapter and with the rules and regulations adopted by the Department of Public Health. Pools which open on or after April 1 and which close on or before October 31 shall be inspected at least once during the period of operation. All other pools shall be inspected at least twice a year.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-45-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214.

Code Commission notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 126, § 1, Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1, and Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3 all enacted a Chapter 43 of Title 31. Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, the chapter enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1 has been redesignated as Chapter 44 of Title 31 and the Code sections therein redesignated accordingly. The chapter enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3 has been redesignated as Chapter 45 of Title 31 and the Code sections therein redesignated accordingly.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-45-9.
Suspension or revocation of permit.

A permit for a public swimming pool may be suspended or revoked by the county board of health for failure to comply with the provisions of this chapter and the rules and regulations adopted by the Department of Public Health.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-45-9

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214.

Code Commission notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 126, § 1, Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1, and Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3 all enacted a Chapter 43 of Title 31. Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, the chapter enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1 has been redesignated as Chapter 44 of Title 31 and the Code sections therein redesignated accordingly. The chapter enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3 has been redesignated as Chapter 45 of Title 31 and the Code sections therein redesignated accordingly.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-45-10.
Rules and regulations.

The Department of Public Health shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations concerning the construction and operation of public swimming pools. The Department of Public Health shall classify public swimming pools on the basis of size, usage, type, or any other appropriate factor and shall adopt requirements for each classification. The rules shall include requirements for:

Submission and review of plans prior to construction;

Application, review, expiration, renewal, and revocation or suspension of an operating permit;

Inspection;

Design and construction including materials, depth and other dimensions, and standards for the abatement of suction hazards; and

Operation and safety including water source, water quality and testing, fencing, water treatment, chemical storage, toilet and bath facilities, measures to ensure the personal cleanliness of bathers, safety equipment, and sewage and other waste-water disposal.

Public swimming pools constructed or remodeled prior to December 31, 2000, that do not meet specific design and construction requirements of the rules and regulations for public swimming pools adopted by the Department of Public Health shall not be required to comply with design and construction requirements other than requirements related to the abatement of suction hazards. Public swimming pools constructed or remodeled prior to December 31, 2000, shall comply with all other rules and regulations for public swimming pools adopted by the Department of Public Health by January 1, 2003.

No single drain, single-suction outlet public swimming pool shall be allowed to operate unless a protective cover is properly installed.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-45-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3; Ga. L. 2001, p. 4, § 31; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214.

Code Commission notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 126, § 1, Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1, and Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3 all enacted a Chapter 43 of Title 31. Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, the chapter enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1 has been redesignated as Chapter 44 of Title 31 and the Code sections therein redesignated accordingly. The chapter enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3 has been redesignated as Chapter 45 of Title 31 and the Code sections therein redesignated accordingly.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-45-11.
Enforcement of rules and regulations.

Each county board of health and its duly authorized agents are authorized and empowered to enforce compliance with the provisions of this chapter and the rules and regulations relating to public swimming pools adopted and promulgated by the Department of Public Health and, in connection therewith, to enter upon and inspect the premises of a public swimming pool at any reasonable time and in a reasonable manner.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-45-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214.

Code Commission notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 126, § 1, Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1, and Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3 all enacted a Chapter 43 of Title 31. Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, the chapter enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1 has been redesignated as Chapter 44 of Title 31 and the Code sections therein redesignated accordingly. The chapter enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3 has been redesignated as Chapter 45 of Title 31 and the Code sections therein redesignated accordingly.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-45-12.
Inspection of unregulated pools.

Notwithstanding any provision of Code Section 31-45-13 regarding the applicability of this chapter to the contrary, a resident or owner of an apartment complex that is not subject to regulation under this chapter or local ordinance may request that the county board of health inspect a pool at such apartment complex. Upon receipt of such a request, the county board of health shall have the authority to inspect such pool at any reasonable time and in a reasonable manner and issue a report on the condition of such pool.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-45-12

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3.

Code Commission notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 126, § 1, Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1, and Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3 all enacted a Chapter 43 of Title 31. Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, the chapter enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1 has been redesignated as Chapter 44 of Title 31 and the Code sections therein redesignated accordingly. The chapter enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3 has been redesignated as Chapter 45 of Title 31 and the Code sections therein redesignated accordingly.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, “31-45-13” was substituted for “31-43-13” in this Code section.

31-45-13.
Applicability of chapter.

The provisions of this chapter shall apply only in those counties where local rules and regulations governing public swimming pools are not in effect on December 31, 2000. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit the authority of a county to adopt an ordinance or resolution regarding public swimming pools that applies to apartment complex pools.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-45-13

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3.

Code Commission notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 126, § 1, Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1, and Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3 all enacted a Chapter 43 of Title 31. Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, the chapter enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1 has been redesignated as Chapter 44 of Title 31 and the Code sections therein redesignated accordingly. The chapter enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3 has been redesignated as Chapter 45 of Title 31 and the Code sections therein redesignated accordingly.